nb: Forretninger og industri > Jordbruk > Husdyrhold: Birøkt; Egginkubatorer; Helse- og veterinærutstyr; Husdyrfôr; Fôrere og vannbeholdere for husdyr; Hodelag til husdyr; Smarte landbrukssystemer
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Kmetijstvo > Živinoreja: Čebelarstvo; Inkubatorji za valjenje jajc; Zdravstveni in veterinarski pripomočki; Krma za živino; Krmilniki in napajalniki za živino; Vrvi za živino; Pametni kmetijski sistemi
sv: Företag och industri > Jordbruk > Boskapsskötsel: Biodling; Äggkläckningsmaskin; Hälso- och veterinärartiklar; Foder till boskap; Mat- och vattensystem för boskap; Boskapsgrimma; Smarta jordbrukssystem
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Landwirtschaft > Viehhaltung: Bienenzucht; Brutapparate; Gesundheits- und Veterinärbedarf; Viehfutter; Viehfutterspender & -tränken; Viehhalfter; Intelligente Landwirtschaftssysteme
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 농업 > 축산업: 양봉; 부화기; 건강 및 수의학 용품; 가축 사료; 사료 공급기/급수기; 굴레; 스마트 농업 시스템
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Poljoprivreda > Stočarstvo: Pčelarstvo; Inkubatori za jaja; Zdravstveni i veterinarski pribor; Hrana za stoku; Hranilice i pojilice za stoku; Povodci za stoku; Pametni poljoprivredni sustavi
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Γεωργία > Κτηνοτροφία: Μελισσοκομία; Εκκολαπτήρια αυγών; Υγειονομικά & Κτηνιατρικά Είδη; Ζωοτροφές; Ταΐστρες και ποτίστρες ζώων εκτροφής; Καπίστρια ζώων εκτροφής; Συστήματα έξυπνης γεωργίας
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Žemės ūkis > Gyvulininkystė: Bitininkystė; Kiaušinių inkubatoriai; Sveikatos ir veterinarijos reikmenys; Gyvulių pašaras; Gyvulių šėryklos ir girdyklos; Kantarai gyvuliams; Išmaniosios ūkininkavimo sistemos
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Agriculture > Élevage: Apiculture; Couveuses à œufs; Fournitures de santé et vétérinaires; Nourriture pour bétail; Mangeoires et abreuvoirs pour bétail; Licols; Systèmes agricoles intelligents
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 农/畜牧/渔业专用设备 > 畜牧业: 养蜂业; 孵蛋器; 卫生与兽医用品; 畜牧饲料; 畜牧业喂食器/饮水器; 牲畜缰绳; 智慧农业系统
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Agricultură > Creșterea animalelor: Apicultură; Incubatoare pentru ouă; Articole pentru sănătate și veterinare; Hrană pentru animale; Dispozitive de hrănire și adăpători pentru animale; Căpestre pentru animale; Sisteme agricole inteligente
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Tarım > Hayvancılık: Arıcılık; Kuluçka Makineleri; Sağlık ve Veterinerlik Malzemeleri; Besi Hayvanı Yemi; Çiftlik Hayvanı Yemlikleri ve Sulukları; Çiftlik Hayvanı Yularları; Akıllı Tarım Sistemleri
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Mezőgazdaság > Állattenyésztés: Méhészet; Tojásinkubátorok; Egészségügyi és állatorvosi kellékek; Haszonállat-takarmány; Haszonállat-etetők és -itatók; Haszonállat-kötőfékek; Intelligens gazdálkodási rendszerek
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Maatalous > Karjatalous: Mehiläistenhoito; Hautomot; Terveys- ja eläinlääkintätarvikkeet; Rehu; Tuotantoeläinten ruoka- ja vesiastiat; Tuotantoeläinten riimut; Älyviljelyjärjestelmät
es: Economía e industria > Agricultura > Cría de animales: Apicultura; Incubadoras de huevos; Suministros de salud y veterinaria; Alimentación de ganado; Comederos y bebederos de ganado; Cabestros para ganado; Sistemas de agricultura inteligente
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Poľnohospodárstvo > Chov zvierat: Včelárstvo; Inkubátory na vajcia; Zdravotnícke a veterinárne potreby; Krmivo pre hospodárske zvieratá; Kŕmidlá a napájadlá pre hospodárske zvieratá; Ohlávky pre hospodárske zvieratá; Inteligentné poľnohospodárske systémy
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Селско стопанство > Животновъдство: Пчеларство; Инкубатори за яйца; Здравни и ветеринарни консумативи; Фураж за добитък; Хранилки и поилки за добитък; Оглавници за добитък; Интелигентни земеделски системи
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > เกษตรกรรม > การเลี้ยงสัตว์: การเลี้ยงผึ้ง; เครื่องฟักไข่; อุปกรณ์สุขภาพและสัตวแพทย์; อาหารสำหรับปศุสัตว์; เครื่องให้อาหารและน้ำในปศุสัตว์; เชือกจูงสัตว์; ระบบเกษตรอัจฉริยะ
da: Erhverv og industri > Landbrug > Husdyrbrug: Biavl; Rugemaskiner; Sundheds- og veterinærartikler; Foder til landbrugsdyr; Fodertrug og vandsystemer til kreaturer; Grimer til husdyr; Smarte landbrugssystemer
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Сельское хозяйство > Животноводство: Пчеловодство; Инкубаторы для яиц; Товары для здоровья и ветеринарии; Корм для скота; Кормушки и поилки для скота; Поводья для скота; Системы смарт-ферм
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Agrarische sector > Veeteelt: Bijenteelt; Broedmachines; Gezondheids- en veterinaire benodigdheden; Veevoer; Veevoederbakken; Halsters voor vee; Slimme landbouwsystemen
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Zemědělství > Zootechnika: Včelařství; Líhně; Zdravotnické a veterinární potřeby; Krmiva pro hospodářská zvířata; Krmítka pro hospodářská zvířata; Ohlávky; Systémy chytrého zemědělství
it: Commercio e industria > Agricoltura > Zootecnia: Apicoltura; Incubatrici di uova; Articoli sanitari e veterinari; Mangime per bestiame; Mangiatoie e abbeveratoi per bestiame; Cavezze per bestiame; Sistemi intelligenti per l'allevamento
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Rolnictwo > Hodowla zwierząt: Pszczelarstwo; Inkubatory jaj; Artykuły zdrowotne i weterynaryjne; Pasza dla zwierząt gospodarskich; Karmniki dla zwierząt hodowlanych; Uzdy dla zwierząt hodowlanych; Inteligentne systemy rolnicze
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 農業 > 畜牧業: 養蜂業; 孵蛋器; 衛生與獸醫用品; 家畜飼料; 牲畜餵食器/給水器; 家畜用籠頭; 智慧農業系統
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Agricultura > Pecuária: Apicultura; Incubadoras de ovos; Suprimentos de saúde e veterinários; Ração para pecuária; Comedouros para gado; Cabrestos para pecuária; Sistemas de agricultura inteligente
en: Business & Industrial > Agriculture > Animal Husbandry: Beekeeping; Egg Incubators; Health & Veterinary Supplies; Livestock Feed; Livestock Feeders & Waterers; Livestock Halters; Smart Farming Systems
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 農業 > 畜産: 養蜂; 孵卵器; 健康・獣医用品; 家畜用飼料; 家畜用餌箱; 家畜用頭絡; スマート農業システム
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nông nghiệp > Chăn nuôi: Nuôi ong; Máy ấp trứng; Vật tư y tế và thú y; Thức ăn gia súc; Dụng cụ cho ăn và cấp nước cho vật nuôi; Chăn thả gia súc; Hệ thống nông nghiệp thông minh
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Agricultura > Criação de animais: Apicultura; Incubadoras de ovos; Artigos de saúde e veterinários; Alimentação animal; Comedouros e bebedouros para pecuária; Arneses para pecuária; Sistemas de agricultura inteligente